Hawaii statutes.
[§466D-6] Fees; disposition. (a) Upon
issuance of a new license and at each license renewal period, each respiratory
therapist shall pay a fee of $304 that shall be deposited into the compliance
resolution fund established pursuant to section 26-9(o).

(b) Application fees paid pursuant to
this chapter shall not be refundable. Pursuant to section 26-9(l), the
director shall establish examination, reexamination, license, renewal,
restoration, penalty, and other fees relating to the administration of this
chapter by rule.

(c) Fees assessed pursuant to this chapter
shall be used to defray costs incurred by the department in implementing this
chapter. [L 2010, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next